Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 6
MARTIAL LAW AND ACTIVE DUTY

Sec.

§ 46-601. Authority of governor.

The governor shall have the power in the event of a state of extreme emergency to order into the active service of the state, the national guard, or any part thereof, and the organized militia, or any part thereof, or both as he may deem proper.

During a period of a state of extreme emergency, the governor shall have complete authority over all agencies of the state government, including all separate boards and commissions, and the right to exercise within the area or regions wherein the state of extreme emergency exists all police power vested in the state by the constitution and the laws of the state of Idaho. In the exercise thereof he is authorized to promulgate, issue and enforce rules, regulations and orders which he considers necessary for the protection of life and property. Such rules, regulations and orders shall, whenever practicable, be prepared in advance of extreme emergency and the governor shall cause widespread publicity and notice to be given of such rules, regulations and orders. Rules, regulations and orders issued under the authority of this section and prepared in advance of a state of extreme emergency shall not become operative until the governor proclaims a state of extreme emergency. Such rules, regulations and orders shall be in writing and shall take effect upon their issuance. They shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state as soon as possible after their issuance. A copy of such rules, regulations and orders shall likewise be filed in the office of the county clerk of each county, any portion of which is included within the area wherein a state of extreme emergency has been proclaimed. Whenever the state of extreme emergency has been ended by either the expiration of the period for which it was proclaimed or the need for said state of extreme emergency has ceased, the governor shall declare the period of the state of extreme emergency to be at an end.

During the continuance of any proclaimed state of extreme emergency, insurrection or martial law, neither the governor nor any agency of any governmental entity or political subdivision of the state shall impose additional restrictions on the lawful possession, transfer, sale, transport, storage, display or use of firearms or ammunition.

“State of extreme emergency” means: (a) the duly proclaimed existence of conditions of extreme peril to the safety of persons and property within the state, or any part thereof, caused by an enemy attack or threatened attack; or (b) the duly proclaimed existence of conditions of extreme peril to the safety of persons and property within the state, or any part thereof, caused by such conditions as air pollution, fire, flood, storm, epidemic, riot or earthquake, insurrection, breach of the peace, which conditions by reason of their magnitude are or are likely to be beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment and facilities of any county, any city, or any city and county.

§ 46-602. Proclamation of martial law.

Whenever a state of extreme emergency has been proclaimed by the governor, the governor if in his judgment the maintenance of law and order will thereby be promoted, and in addition to the proclaiming of said state of extreme emergency, may by proclamation declare the state, county, or city, or any specified portion thereof, to be in a state of insurrection and may declare martial law therein.

§ 46-603. Active duty — Idaho code of military justice in force — Court-martial

Additional jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

§ 46-604. Cooperation of militia with civil authorities — Calling out military forces.

When the national guard or the organized militia shall be ordered into the active service of the state during a state of extreme emergency, or for any other cause, the commanding officer of the military personnel shall cooperate with the civil officers to the fullest extent, consistent with the accomplishment of the object, for which the military personnel were called; the civil officials may express to the commander of the military personnel the general or specific object which the civil officials desire to accomplish, but the tactical direction of the military personnel, the kind and extent of force to be used, and the particular means to be employed to accomplish the object specified by the civil officers are left solely to the officers in charge of the military personnel. In case of any breach of the peace, tumult, riot, resistance to process of this state, or a state of extreme emergency, or imminent danger thereof, the sheriff of a county may call for aid upon the commander-in-chief of the national guard.

§ 46-605. Pay on active duty.

When the national guard or any part thereof is ordered on active duty in the service of the state, the enlisted personnel, the commissioned officers and warrant officers so ordered shall be entitled to the same pay as enlisted personnel, officers and warrant officers of like grade and length of service in the armed forces of the United States and they shall be entitled to the same allowances as enlisted personnel, officers and warrant officers of like grade and length of service in the armed forces of the United States. All payments of pay and allowances under this section shall be made by the adjutant general. No deductions shall be made from the pay of officers or enlisted personnel in active service of the state for dues or other financial obligations imposed by any bylaw, rules or regulations of a civil character. When lodging or meals, or both, cannot be provided by the state, the adjutant general may pay a per diem in addition to the pay and allowances. Nothing in this section shall preclude officers or enlisted personnel in active service of the state from accepting, in lieu of the pay entitlement provided above, greater pay and allowances that may be available from any other government department or agency through cooperative agreement or otherwise.

§ 46-606. Incapacity as result of active duty

Claims. [Repealed.]

§ 46-607. Pay on active duty — State liable for expenses and claims.

All officers and enlisted personnel of the national guard not in the service of the United States, while on duty or assembled therefor, pursuant to the orders of the governor, or any other civil officer authorized by law to make such demand on the military forces of the state in case of a state of extreme emergency, or threats thereof, or whenever called upon in aid of civil authorities, shall receive the same pay and allowances for such service as that prescribed in section 46-605, Idaho Code; and such compensation and the necessary expenses incurred in quartering, caring for, warning for duty, and transporting and subsisting the military personnel as well as the expense incurred for pay, care and subsistence of officers and enlisted personnel shall be paid by the state.

§ 46-608. Pensions for death in active service. [Repealed.]

§ 46-609. Officers and enlisted personnel on special duty — Compensation and allowances.

Officers and enlisted personnel of the national guard may be ordered upon special duty at the direction of the adjutant general, if with their consent, for a period not to exceed seventy-two (72) hours without the approval of the governor, or at the direction of the governor as commander-in-chief, with or without their consent. They shall receive the pay and allowances provided in section 46-605, Idaho Code, during the time they may continue upon duty under such order.

§ 46-610. Military maneuvers and camps

Compensation. [Repealed.]